California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 43.)
-------------------------------------------

20629.

Property taxes means the amount representing the claimant’s proportionate share of real estate taxes for the fiscal year for which postponement is claimed, determined in accord with the method prescribed in Section 216(b) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 488, Sec. 90.5.   Effective July 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

20630.

(a) A claimant may file with the Controller, a claim for postponement from the State of California of a sum equal to, but not exceeding the amount of property taxes, as defined in Section 20629, for the fiscal year for which the claim is made.

(b) Upon verification of the eligibility requirements set forth in Section 20630.5, the Controller shall mail
 the claimant a Notice of Election to Postpone which shall be in the form and contain such information as the Controller may prescribe. Accompanying the notice shall be a statement explaining that in order for the claimant to postpone all or part of the property taxes, the Notice of Election to Postpone must be mailed to the Controller with the following:

(1) A statement signed by an authorized officer of the cooperative housing corporation indicating the amount of the claimant’s proportionate share of property taxes and the method used to compute such amount.

(2) A recognition agreement signed by the claimant and executed by an officer of the corporation which acknowledges the assignment of the proprietary lease and the pledging of the claimant’s shares in the corporation as security for postponement, and sets forth the rights and duties of the state, the corporation and the
 claimant with respect to such stock and the proprietary lease. The recognition agreement shall be in such form and contain such provisions as the Controller shall prescribe.

(3) Any other additional security interest, created and perfected with respect to the rights of third persons in the manner provided by law for such type of security interest, which the Controller deems necessary to protect the interest of the state with regard to the repayment of postponed amounts by the claimant or a deceased claimant’s estate.

(c) When the Controller approves the Notice of Election to Postpone, the Controller shall issue payment to a county tax collector or other appropriate payee as determined by the Controller for the property taxes owed by the claimant. Payments may, upon appropriation by the Legislature, be made out of the amounts appropriated pursuant to Section 16180 of the Government
 Code that are secured by a secured tax lien and obligation as specified by Article 1 (commencing with Section 16180) of Chapter 5 of Division 4 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 387, Sec. 27.   (SB 205)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

20630.5.

Claims made under this chapter shall be filed with the Controller after October 1 of the fiscal year in which postponement is claimed and on or before February 10 of such fiscal year. If February 10th falls on Saturday, Sunday or a legal holiday, the date is extended to the next business day. The claim shall be on a form supplied by the Controller and shall contain:

(a) Evidence acceptable to the Controller that the individual was an eligible claimant.

(b) A statement showing the household income for the period set forth in Section 20503.

(c) A statement describing the residential dwelling.

(d) Any other information necessary for the Controller to determine eligibility under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 391, Sec. 17.   (SB 801)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

20632.

The Controller shall maintain a record of all persons who have received postponement amounts pursuant to this chapter. Such record shall include the name and address of the claimant, the name and address of the cooperative housing corporation and any other information deemed necessary by the Controller for administration purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 43.)
-------------------------------------------

20634.

All amounts postponed pursuant to this chapter shall be due if any of the following occurs:

(a) The claimant ceases to occupy the cooperative residential unit, or sells or otherwise disposes of shares in the cooperative housing corporation.

(b) The claimant dies. However, if the surviving spouse or another person eligible to postpone pursuant to this chapter continues to occupy the cooperative residential unit, then the postponed amounts shall not be due unless such person dies, ceases to occupy the residential unit, or the shares are sold, or
 otherwise transferred.

(c) The failure of the claimant or the cooperative housing corporation to perform those acts specified in the recognition agreement, or the failure of the claimant to perform those acts required by a security interest holder which is senior to the state’s security interest for postponed amounts.

(d) Postponement was erroneously allowed because eligibility requirements were not met.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 43.)
-------------------------------------------

20635.

The Controller shall reduce the amount postponed pursuant to this chapter by the amounts of any payment received for that purpose and by notification by the Franchise Tax Board of assistance payable pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 20501). The Controller shall increase the amount postponed to reflect subsequent postponement payments pursuant to this chapter and accrued interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 43.)
-------------------------------------------

20636.

If a surviving spouse becomes eligible to postpone property taxes pursuant to this chapter, any postponement payments to such person shall be added to the postponement amounts paid to the deceased spouse.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 43.)
-------------------------------------------

20637.

If the Controller determines that amounts postponed under this chapter have become due and payable, the Controller may take any or all of the following actions:

(a) Demand payment of such amount from the claimant, the estate of any decedent claimant, or any person who was a co-owner with the claimant of the cooperative housing corporation shares.

(b) Direct the Department of General Services to sell any property, including shares in the cooperative housing corporation, pledged by the claimant as security for postponement. The cooperative housing
 corporation from which the shares were issued shall have first opportunity to purchase at fair market value any shares in the cooperative housing corporation offered for sales under this subdivision, according to a procedure set forth by the Controller in the Recognition Agreement prepared pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 20630.

(c) Request the Attorney General to bring an action against the claimant to recover amounts postponed under this chapter by the claimant.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 43.)
-------------------------------------------

20638.

Upon written request of a person who has postponed pursuant to this chapter, or an agent of such person, or an agent of the affected cooperative housing corporation, the Controller shall issue such person a written statement showing the total amount postponed, together with accrued interest. The Controller may establish a reasonable fee, not to exceed thirty dollars ($30) for the provision of the statement of postponement
 status provided by this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 391, Sec. 19.   (SB 801)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.3. Senior Citizens Manufactured Home Property Tax Postponement Law [20639. - 20639.13.]

20639.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Senior Citizens Manufactured Home Property Tax Postponement Law.”

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 896, Sec. 15.   (SB 1130)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Operative July 1, 2019, pursuant to 20639.13.)
-------------------------------------------

20639.1.

(a) Unless the context otherwise requires or unless otherwise provided in this chapter, the definitions given in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 20501) and Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 20581) shall govern the construction of this chapter.

(b) Unless the context otherwise dictates or unless otherwise provided in this chapter, Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 101) and Chapter 2 (commencing with Section
 155) of Part 1 of Division 1, Section 2931c of the Civil Code, Division 9 (commencing with Section 9101) of the Commercial Code, Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 14735) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 16180) of Part 1 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and Division 13 (commencing with Section 17000) of the Health and Safety Code shall be applicable to property tax postponements made pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 896, Sec. 15.   (SB 1130)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Operative July 1, 2019, pursuant to 20639.13.)
-------------------------------------------

20639.2.

As used in this part, “manufactured home” means a manufactured home as defined in Section 18007 of the Health and Safety Code that was constructed on or after June 15, 1976. “Manufactured home” includes both of the following:

(a) A manufactured home which has become real property by being affixed to the land on a permanent foundation system or otherwise and is taxed as all other real property is taxed.

(b) A manufactured home which is situated on real property owned by the claimant.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 896, Sec. 15.   (SB 1130)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Operative July 1, 2019, pursuant to 20639.13.)
-------------------------------------------

20639.4.

(a) Subject to the limitations provided in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 20501) or Chapter 2 (commencing with 20581), a claimant may file with the Controller a claim for postponement of a sum equal to but not exceeding the amount of property taxes for the fiscal year for which the claim is made.

(b) Any manufactured home on which property taxes are delinquent at the time the application for postponement
 under this chapter is made or on which any other property tax or special assessment imposed by a special district or other tax code are delinquent at the time of application for postponement under this chapter is made shall not be eligible for postponement.

(c) The Controller shall mail to the claimant for due execution, the appropriate security instruments required by the Controller.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 896, Sec. 15.   (SB 1130)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Operative July 1, 2019, pursuant to 20639.13.)
-------------------------------------------

20639.5.

The Controller may require security for the postponement of property taxes pursuant to this chapter of the following:

(a) A security interest in the manufactured home in the form and manner prescribed by the Controller.

(b) (1) Any other additional security interest created and perfected with respect to the rights of third persons in the manner
 provided by law for such type of security interest which the Controller deems necessary to protect the interest of the state with regard to the repayment of postponed amounts by the claimant or the deceased claimant’s estate.

(2) On the form supplied by the Controller, the claimant shall obtain the written consent of any legal owner if other than the claimant and the written consent of any junior lienholder. The consent shall be in the form and contain the provisions as prescribed by the Controller, and shall provide for written notice by the legal owner or junior lienholder, or both, to the Controller of the occurrence of a default by the claimant under the terms of an existing security agreement.

(c) The consent of all co-owners, if any, to the pledging of the manufactured home as security for repayment of postponed property taxes.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 896, Sec. 15.   (SB 1130)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Operative July 1, 2019, pursuant to 20639.13.)
-------------------------------------------

20639.6.

(a) Upon receipt of the information described in Section 20639.9, the Controller shall determine whether the state’s interest would be adequately protected if postponement is granted, and, if so, the Controller shall make payments directly to the county tax collector for the property taxes owed on behalf of a qualified claimant. Payments may, upon appropriation by the Legislature, be made out of the amounts appropriated pursuant to Section 16180 of the Government Code.

(b) For manufactured homes situated on real property owned by the claimant, payments will be secured by a secured tax lien and obligation as specified by subdivision (b) of Section 16182 of the Government Code.

(c) For manufactured homes situated on real property not owned by the claimant, payments will be secured by a security agreement as specified by subdivision (c) of Section 16182 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 896, Sec. 15.   (SB 1130)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Operative July 1, 2019, pursuant to 20639.13.)
-------------------------------------------

20639.7.

The Controller shall prescribe the manner in which a claimant eligible under this chapter, who for any reason is incapacitated, may appoint his or her spouse or authorized agent, or have any such person appointed for the claimant, for all purposes of postponement of property taxes.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 896, Sec. 15.   (SB 1130)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Operative July 1, 2019, pursuant to 20639.13.)
-------------------------------------------

20639.8.

The claim for postponement shall be filed after October 1 of the fiscal year in which the postponement is claimed and on or before February 10 of that fiscal year. If February 10 falls on Saturday, Sunday, or a legal holiday, the date is extended to the next business day.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 896, Sec. 15.   (SB 1130)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Operative July 1, 2019, pursuant to 20639.13.)
-------------------------------------------

20639.9.

Each claimant applying for postponement under this chapter shall file a claim under penalty of perjury with the Controller on a form supplied by the Controller. The claim shall contain all of the following:

(a) All information required under Section 20621.

(b) A copy of the Certificate of Title issued by the Department of Housing and Community Development.

(c) A copy of the registration card issued by the Department of Housing and Community Development.

(d) Other information required by the Controller to establish eligibility.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 896, Sec. 15.   (SB 1130)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Operative July 1, 2019, pursuant to 20639.13.)
-------------------------------------------

20639.10.

The Controller shall maintain a record of all persons who have received postponement amounts pursuant to this chapter. That record shall include the name and address of the claimant, the name and address of the legal owner of the manufactured home, the name and address of any other party whose consent is required by this chapter, and any other information deemed necessary by the Controller for administration purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 896, Sec. 15.   (SB 1130)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Operative July 1, 2019, pursuant to 20639.13.)
-------------------------------------------

20639.11.

All amounts postponed pursuant to this chapter shall be due if any of the following occurs:

(a) The claimant ceases to occupy the residential dwelling as the principal place of residence, sells, or otherwise disposes of his or her manufactured home.

(b) The claimant dies. However, if the surviving spouse previously approved pursuant to this chapter continues to occupy
 the manufactured home, then the postponed amounts shall not be due unless that person dies or ceases to occupy the residential dwelling.

(c) The failure of a claimant to perform those acts required by the legal owner or junior lienholder.

(d) The claimant allows any subsequent taxes to remain unpaid or to be transferred to the unsecured roll.

(e) Postponement was erroneously allowed because eligibility requirements were not met.

(f) The claimant is refinancing the residential dwelling.

(g) The claimant has elected to participate in a reverse mortgage program for the residential dwelling.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 896, Sec. 15.   (SB 1130)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Operative July 1, 2019, pursuant to 20639.13.)
-------------------------------------------

20639.12.

If the Controller determines that amounts postponed under this chapter have become due and payable, the Controller may take any or all of the following actions:

(a) Demand payment of that amount from the claimant, the estate of any decedent claimant, or any person who was a cotenant with the claimant pursuant to the registration card.

(b) Direct the Department of
 General Services to seize and sell any property pledged by the claimant as security for postponement.

(c) Request the Attorney General to bring an action to recover amounts postponed under this chapter by the claimant.

(d) Utilize any or all of the other enforcement and foreclosure provisions set forth in Article 3 (commencing with Section 16200) of Chapter 5 of Part 1 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code, as may be applicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 896, Sec. 15.   (SB 1130)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Operative July 1, 2019, pursuant to 20639.13.)
-------------------------------------------

20639.13.

This chapter shall become operative on July 1, 2019.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 896, Sec. 15.   (SB 1130)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.5. Senior Citizens Possessory Interest Holder Property Tax Postponement Law [20640. - 20640.12.]

20640.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Senior Citizens Possessory Interest Holder Property Tax Postponement Law.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 576.)
-------------------------------------------

20640.1.

(a) Unless the context otherwise requires or unless otherwise provided in this chapter, the definitions given in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 20501) and Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 20581) shall govern the construction of this chapter.

(b) Unless the context otherwise dictates or unless otherwise provided in this chapter, the provisions of Chapter 1 and Chapter 2 of this code, Civil Code Section 2924b, Civil Code Section 2931c, Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 14735) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 16180) of
 Part 1 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code shall be applicable to property tax postponements made pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 576.)
-------------------------------------------

20640.2.

For the purposes of this chapter:

(a) “Possessory interest” means (1) possession of, or right to the possession of land located in this state whether or not coupled with ownership of the residential dwelling on the same, or (2) a possessory interest or right of occupancy on tax exempt land;

(b) “Residential
 dwelling” means a dwelling occupied as the principal place of residence of the claimant, and so much of the land surrounding it as is reasonably necessary for use of the dwelling as a home, located on possessory interest property. It shall include condominiums and affixed manufactured homes upon which property taxes, as defined in subdivision (c), are assessed. It also includes part of a multidwelling or multipurpose building and a part of the land upon which it is built.

(c) “Property taxes” means the amount of property tax for which the claimant is personally liable as assessee or is obligated to pay directly to the tax collector pursuant to the terms of the agreement establishing the possessory interest, including all ad valorem property taxes, special assessments, capitalization of leasehold interest, and other charges or user fees which are attributable to the residential dwelling on the county tax bill and the ad valorem property taxes,
 special assessments, capitalization of leasehold interest, or other charges or user fees appearing on the tax bill of any chartered city which levies and collects its own property taxes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 896, Sec. 17.   (SB 1130)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

20640.3.

A claimant is an individual who:

(a) Holds a right to a possessory interest pursuant to a validly recorded instrument conveying such possessory interest for a term of years no less than 45 years beyond the last day of the calendar year ending immediately prior to the fiscal year for which taxes are initially postponed.

(b) Occupies as a principal place of residence the residential dwelling affixed to such possessory interest real property on the last day of the year designated in subdivision (d) of Section 20503.

(c) Is either (1) 62 years of age or older on or before December 31 of the fiscal year for which postponement is claimed or (2) blind or disabled, as defined in Section 12050 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, at the time of application or on February 10 of the fiscal year for which the postponement is claimed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 387, Sec. 28.   (SB 205)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

20640.4.

(a) Subject to the limitations provided in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 20501), Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 20581), or this chapter, a claimant may file with the Controller, a claim for postponement of a sum equal to, but not exceeding the amount of property taxes, for the fiscal year for which the claim is made.

(b) Upon
 verification of the eligibility requirements set forth in Section 20640.9 the Controller shall mail the claimant a Notice of Election to Postpone which shall be in the form and contain such information as the Controller may prescribe. Accompanying the notice shall be a statement explaining that in order for the claimant to postpone all or part of the property taxes, the Notice of Election to Postpone must be mailed to the Controller with a copy of the instrument creating the possessory interest, said copy to be certified by the county recorder of the county in which such real property is located. Where a memorandum of lease has been recorded in lieu of such instrument, a certified copy of said memorandum shall accompany the copy of the instrument creating the possessory interest.

(c) Any possessory interest or improvement on which property taxes are delinquent at the time the application for postponement under this
 chapter is made or on which any other property tax or special assessment imposed by a special district or other tax code area are delinquent at the time the application for postponement under this chapter is made shall not be eligible for postponement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 391, Sec. 30.   (SB 801)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

20640.5.

(a) The Controller may require as security for the postponement of property taxes pursuant to this chapter any of the following:

1. An assignment to the State of California of the remaining term of the claimant’s possessory interest.

2. A security interest in any improvement owned or leased by claimant located on the land which is subject to the possessory interest.

3. Any other additional security interest, created and perfected with respect to the rights of
 third persons in the manner provided by law for such type of security interest, which the Controller deems necessary to protect the interest of the state with regard to the repayment of postponed amounts by the claimant or a deceased claimant’s estate.

(b) On the form supplied by the Controller, the claimant shall obtain the written consent of any coholder of the possessory interest and of the grantor of the possessory interest to the assignment by claimant of the remaining term of claimant’s possessory interest. The consent shall be in such form and contain such provisions as the Controller shall prescribe, and shall provide for written notice by the grantor of the possessory interest to the Controller of the occurrence of a default by the claimant under the terms of the instrument creating the possessory interest, a coholder or a prior recorded possessory interest holder which would result in the termination or diminution of claimant’s
 interest.

The term “grantor of the possessory interest,” as used in this section shall be deemed to include the fee owner of the real property subject to the possessory interest and the holders of all prior recorded unterminated possessory interests.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 576.)
-------------------------------------------

20640.6.

(a) Upon receipt of the information described in Section 20640.4 and Section 20640.5, the Controller shall determine whether the state’s interest would be adequately protected if postponement is granted, and if so, the Controller shall make payments directly to a county tax collector, or chartered city that levies and collects its own taxes, for the property taxes owed on behalf of the claimant.
 Payments may, upon appropriation by the Legislature, be made out of the amounts appropriated pursuant to Section 16180 of the Government Code that are secured by a secured tax lien and obligation as specified by Article 1 (commencing with Section 16180) of Chapter 5 of Division 4 of the Government Code.

(b) The Controller shall cause to be recorded with the county recorder of the county in which the real property is located, a copy of any instrument creating a security interest, which shall include applicable consent forms, in favor of the state. The instrument shall contain a legal description of the real property subject to the possessory interest; and, if the legal description of the possessory interest describes an area less than the entire property ownership, the notice or document shall also contain a reference to the record of the acquisition instrument to the entire parcel from which the possessory interest was created. The priority of
 the security interest shall be as of the date of recordation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 391, Sec. 31.   (SB 801)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

20640.7.

The Controller shall prescribe the manner in which a claimant eligible under this chapter, who for any reason is incapacitated, may appoint his or her spouse or an authorized agent, or have any such person appointed for such claimant, for all purposes of claiming and receiving postponement of property taxes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 391, Sec. 32.   (SB 801)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

20640.8.

The claim for postponement shall be filed after October 1 of the fiscal year in which postponement is claimed and on or before February 10 of such fiscal year. If February 10th falls on Saturday, Sunday or a legal holiday, the date is extended to the next business day.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 391, Sec. 33.   (SB 801)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

20640.9.

Each claimant applying for postponement under this chapter shall file a claim under penalty of perjury with the Controller on a form supplied by the Controller. The claim shall contain:

(a) Evidence acceptable to the Controller that the person was 62 years of age or older, or blind or disabled as described in Section 20640.3.

(b) A statement showing the household income for the period set forth in Section 20503.

(c) A statement describing the residential dwelling in such manner as the Controller may prescribe.

(d) The name of the county in which the residential dwelling is located and the address of the residential dwelling.

(e) The county assessor’s parcel number applicable to the property for which the claimant is applying for the postponement of property taxes.

(f) Other information required by the Controller to establish eligibility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 391, Sec. 34.   (SB 801)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

20640.10.

The Controller shall maintain a record of all persons who have received postponement amounts pursuant to this chapter. Such record shall include the name and address of the claimant, the name and address of the fee title owner of the real property, the name and address of any other party whose consent to the assignment is required by this chapter, and any other information deemed necessary by the Controller for administration purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 576.)
-------------------------------------------

20640.11.

All amounts postponed pursuant to this chapter shall be due if any of the following occurs:

(a) The claimant ceases to occupy the residential dwelling as the principal place of residence, sells or otherwise disposes of his possessory interest, or the possessory interest agreement expires by its terms.

(b) The claimant dies. However, if the surviving spouse or another person eligible to postpone pursuant to this chapter continues to occupy the residential dwelling, then the postponed amounts shall not be due unless such person dies, or ceases
 to occupy the residential dwelling.

(c) The failure of the claimant, the fee title owner, or any owner of a prior recorded possessory interest to perform those acts required by a security interest holder which is senior to the state’s security interest for postponed amounts.

(d) Postponement was erroneously allowed because eligibility requirements were not met.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 576.)
-------------------------------------------

20640.12.

If the Controller determines that amounts postponed under this chapter have become due and payable, the Controller may take any or all of the following actions:

(a) Demand payment of such amount from the claimant, the estate of any decedent claimant, or any person who was a cotenant with the claimant pursuant to the possessory interest agreement.

(b) Direct the Department of General Services to sell any property pledged by the claimant as security for postponement.

(c) Request
 the Attorney General to bring an action to recover amounts postponed under this chapter by the claimant.

(d) Utilize any or all of the enforcement and foreclosure provisions set forth in Article 3, Chapter 6 of Part 1 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 576.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Administration [20641. - 20646.]

20641.

Forms filed pursuant to this part shall not be under oath but shall contain, or be verified by, a written declaration that they are made under the penalty of perjury. All forms filed pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 20501) shall require such information as the Franchise Tax Board may from time to time prescribe, and shall be filed with the Franchise Tax Board. The Franchise Tax Board shall prepare blank forms for the claimant
 and shall distribute them throughout the state and furnish them upon application. All forms filed pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 20581), Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 20625), Chapter 3.3 (commencing with Section 20639), or Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 20640), shall require such information as the Controller may from time to time prescribe, shall be filed with the Controller, and the Controller shall prepare such blank forms for the claimant and shall distribute them throughout the state and furnish them upon application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 896, Sec. 18.   (SB 1130)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

20641.5.

If the Controller determines that good cause exists, a reasonable extension for filing a claim under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 20581), Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 20625), Chapter 3.3 (commencing with Section 20639), or Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 20640) may be granted. However, no extension shall be granted beyond the fiscal year for which postponement is claimed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1051, Sec. 23.)
-------------------------------------------

20642.

Except as otherwise expressly provided by this part, the Franchise Tax Board shall administer and enforce this part and the provisions of Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 19501) of Part 10.2 shall apply to this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 374, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

20643.

If any claimant fails or refuses to furnish any information requested in writing by the Franchise Tax Board, pursuant to this part, Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 20501), or by the Controller, pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 20581), Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 20625), Chapter 3.3 (commencing with Section 20639), or Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 20640) or files a fraudulent claim, the assistance or postponement authorized by this part shall be disallowed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1051, Sec. 24.)
-------------------------------------------

20644.

Any claim for assistance or postponement which is less than that claimed on the form due to a mathematical error is not a fraudulent claim. Postponement or assistance of any amount erroneously claimed on the form is prohibited.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1242.)
-------------------------------------------

20644.5.

No interest shall be allowed on any assistance or postponement payment made to a claimant pursuant to this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 43.)
-------------------------------------------

20645.

If the Franchise Tax Board determines that assistance has been erroneously granted under this part, or if a claimant is aggrieved by the denial in whole or in part for assistance, then the provisions in Chapters 2 (commencing with Section 18501), 4 (commencing with Section 19001), 5 (commencing with Section 19201), and 6 (commencing with Section 19301) of Part 10.2 shall apply, as if the amount in controversy was a tax, unless the context indicates otherwise. For the purposes of Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 19501) of Part 10.2 (relating to disclosure of
 information), a claim filed pursuant to this part shall be deemed a tax return and disclosure of information set forth therein is prohibited unless required for administrative purposes by the Franchise Tax Board or the Controller.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 374, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

20645.1.

If the Controller determines that postponement has been erroneously granted under this part, or if a claimant is aggrieved by the denial in whole or in part for postponement, the claimant shall have the right to appeal to the Controller or his designee under the appeal procedures established by the Controller’s office. For the purpose of this section, disclosure of information relating to an appeal by a claimant is prohibited unless required for administrative purposes by the Controller.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 925, Sec. 16.5.   Effective September 18, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

20645.5.

(a) If a postponement claim under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 20581), Chapter 3.3 (commencing with Section 20639), or Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 20640) is received by the Controller by February 10 for the fiscal year in which postponement is being claimed or by another date set by the Controller pursuant to Section 20622, then any delinquent penalties, costs, fees, and interest accrued for that
 fiscal year shall be canceled unless the failure to perfect the claim was due to willful neglect on the part of the claimant or representative.

(b) In the event of willful neglect, a payment from the Controller for that current fiscal year can be used to pay delinquent taxes only if accompanied by sufficient amounts to pay all of the delinquent penalties, costs, fees, and interest. If an amount sufficient to pay all of the delinquent penalties, costs, fees, and interest is not received by the tax collector within 30 days from the date of the payment from the Controller, the tax collector may return the payment to the Controller to deny the postponement claim.

(c) (1) The Controller shall notify the claimant in writing when the payment has been submitted to the tax collector.

(2) In the event of
 willful neglect, in addition to the information required pursuant to paragraph (1), the Controller shall also notify the claimant in writing and provide a copy of the notification to the tax collector that a payment amount sufficient to pay all of the delinquent penalties, costs, fees, and interest must be received by the tax collector within 30 days from the date of the payment from the Controller to the county and that if this payment is not received by the tax collector, the tax collector may return the payment to the Controller to deny the postponement claim.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 387, Sec. 30.   (SB 205)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

20645.6.

(a) If the Controller denies a postponement claim under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 20581), Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 20625), Chapter 3.3 (commencing with Section 20639), or Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 20640), and the denial is reversed after appeal pursuant to Section 20645.1, the Controller shall transfer funds to the county for the amount of the taxes. If the taxes for the fiscal year
 were previously paid, the county shall refund the overpayment to the taxpayer. If the taxes for the fiscal year are delinquent, any resulting penalties or interest shall be canceled.

(b) The Controller shall notify the claimant in writing when a payment has been made pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 387, Sec. 31.   (SB 205)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

20645.7.

(a) In addition to the criminal penalty provided by Section 20645.9, any tax preparer who endorses or otherwise negotiates (directly or through an agent) any warrant made with respect to assistance claimed under this part which is issued to a claimant (other than the tax preparer) shall pay a penalty of two hundred fifty dollars ($250) with respect to each such warrant. The preceding sentence does not apply with respect to the deposit by a bank (as defined by Section 581 of the Internal Revenue Code) of the full amount of the warrant in the claimant’s account in that bank for the benefit of the claimant.

(b) For purposes of subdivision (a), “tax preparer” means any person who prepares for compensation, or who employs one or more persons to prepare for compensation, any claim for assistance under this part. For purposes of the preceding sentence, the preparation of a substantial portion of such a claim shall be treated as if it were the preparation of the claim.

A person shall not be a “tax preparer” merely because the person does any of the following:

(1) Furnishes typing, reproducing, or other mechanical assistance.
